trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/be/hunspell/be_BY.aff
FLAG num
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 0 іна .
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 0 ватымі .
SFX 963 Y 1
SFX 963 0 іне .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 0 уючымі .
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 0 вога .
SFX 1928 Y 1
SFX 1928 0 істага .
SFX 4782 Y 1
SFX 4782 0 гаўшымі .
SFX 4371 Y 1
SFX 4371 0 дае .
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 0 дай .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 дам .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 раецца .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 0 чыцу .
SFX 2279 Y 1
SFX 2279 0 чыцы .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 чыць .
SFX 3072 Y 1
SFX 3072 0 авіка .
SFX 3752 Y 1
SFX 3752 0 жваўся .
SFX 4565 Y 1
SFX 4565 0 оўваеце .
SFX 4550 Y 1
SFX 4550 0 оўваўшым .
SFX 2424 Y 1
SFX 2424 0 зячым .
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 0 ўскіх .
SFX 1689 Y 1
SFX 1689 0 ўскія .
SFX 4443 Y 1
SFX 4443 0 ізуеш .
SFX 2981 Y 1
SFX 2981 0 ьскім .
SFX 2676 Y 1
SFX 2676 0 шчыну .
SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 0 шчыны .
SFX 484 Y 1
SFX 484 0 уйце .
SFX 1532 Y 1
SFX 1532 0 істу .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 істы .
SFX 2876 Y 1
SFX 2876 0 усе .
SFX 2031 Y 1
SFX 2031 0 каючага .
SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 0 авальных .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 авальныя .
SFX 4719 Y 1
SFX 4719 0 мерамі .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 0 чкай .
SFX 1011 Y 1
SFX 1011 0 чкам .
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 0 анка .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 0 ізаваны .
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 0 жалі .
SFX 2829 Y 1
SFX 2829 0 авальнае .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 0 авальнай .
SFX 4798 Y 1
SFX 4798 0 арскіх .
SFX 4923 Y 1
SFX 4923 0 арскія .
SFX 3764 Y 1
SFX 3764 0 віка .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 рскаму .
SFX 4649 Y 1
SFX 4649 0 ыўная .
SFX 2286 Y 1
SFX 2286 0 ўных .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 0 ўныя .
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 0 кнуў .
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 0 ьваюцца .
SFX 2449 Y 1
SFX 2449 0 ызму .
SFX 2944 Y 1
SFX 2944 0 льніках .
SFX 3012 Y 1
SFX 3012 0 льнікаў .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 туюць .
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 0 ваешся .
SFX 1542 Y 1
SFX 1542 0 нным .
SFX 4426 Y 1
SFX 4426 0 куеце .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 коў .
SFX 4604 Y 1
SFX 4604 0 жыць .
SFX 1788 Y 1
SFX 1788 0 мага .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 ваны .
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 0 авое .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 авой .
SFX 3706 Y 1
SFX 3706 0 рыцца .
SFX 3080 Y 1
SFX 3080 0 чваецца .
SFX 2060 Y 1
SFX 2060 0 нічаюць .
SFX 1550 Y 1
SFX 1550 0 авога .
SFX 2474 Y 1
SFX 2474 0 ьвалася .
SFX 3056 Y 1
SFX 3056 0 іраванага .
SFX 2685 Y 1
SFX 2685 0 тавымі .
SFX 3133 Y 1
SFX 3133 0 шчам .
SFX 3916 Y 1
SFX 3916 0 рыліся .
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 0 ліла .
SFX 2789 Y 1
SFX 2789 0 таўшага .
SFX 4532 Y 1
SFX 4532 0 хнулі .
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 0 іяй .
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 0 іям .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 нічалі .
SFX 3314 Y 1
SFX 3314 0 заўшаю .
SFX 3313 Y 1
SFX 3313 0 заўшая .
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 0 раўшага .
SFX 1882 Y 1
SFX 1882 0 ачкай .
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 0 ачкам .
SFX 3553 Y 1
SFX 3553 0 зіўшыся .
SFX 4430 Y 1
SFX 4430 0 ізуючым .
SFX 387 Y 1
SFX 387 0 тым .
SFX 3042 Y 1
SFX 3042 0 істкамі .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 0 ючым .
SFX 4094 Y 1
SFX 4094 0 саўшаю .
SFX 4093 Y 1
SFX 4093 0 саўшая .
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 0 ленаму .
SFX 4747 Y 1
SFX 4747 0 каватаю .
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 0 каватая .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 аватымі .
SFX 2638 Y 1
SFX 2638 0 яўшымі .
SFX 4465 Y 1
SFX 4465 0 зуюцца .
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 0 ліваць .
SFX 3165 Y 1
SFX 3165 0 жваюць .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 0 чымі .
SFX 1276 Y 1
SFX 1276 0 шчыца .
SFX 4651 Y 1
SFX 4651 0 шчыце .
SFX 2689 Y 1
SFX 2689 0 льнік .
SFX 3665 Y 1
SFX 3665 0 йскіх .
SFX 3745 Y 1
SFX 3745 0 йскія .
SFX 833 Y 1
SFX 833 0 ышся .
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 0 аючымі .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 аўшыся .
SFX 4495 Y 1
SFX 4495 0 днаю .
SFX 4180 Y 1
SFX 4180 0 дная .
SFX 2544 Y 1
SFX 2544 0 руецца .
SFX 3886 Y 1
SFX 3886 0 ціліся .
SFX 793 Y 1
SFX 793 0 аваны .
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 0 лены .
SFX 1377 Y 1
SFX 1377 0 ляючаму .
SFX 4552 Y 1
SFX 4552 0 оўваўшую .
SFX 3404 Y 1
SFX 3404 0 чніку .
SFX 2425 Y 1
SFX 2425 0 зячую .
SFX 3793 Y 1
SFX 3793 0 чнікі .
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 0 ера .
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 0 нуўшымі .
SFX 3627 Y 1
SFX 3627 0 ысткай .
SFX 3691 Y 1
SFX 3691 0 ысткам .
SFX 3614 Y 1
SFX 3614 0 ьшчыках .
SFX 3615 Y 1
SFX 3615 0 ьшчыкаў .
SFX 1415 Y 1
SFX 1415 0 ачка .
SFX 4609 Y 1
SFX 4609 0 жаўшы .
SFX 4119 Y 1
SFX 4119 0 нту .
SFX 4414 Y 1
SFX 4414 0 нты .
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 0 нах .
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 0 наю .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 ная .
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 0 наў .
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 0 чах .
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 0 чаю .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 чая .
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 0 чаў .
SFX 2664 Y 1
SFX 2664 0 рскага .
SFX 4883 Y 1
SFX 4883 0 льна .
SFX 4528 Y 1
SFX 4528 0 цець .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 чваўшы .
SFX 3646 Y 1
SFX 3646 0 ўнае .
SFX 1109 Y 1
SFX 1109 0 ўнай .
SFX 2265 Y 1
SFX 2265 0 ьваўшаю .
SFX 2264 Y 1
SFX 2264 0 ьваўшая .
SFX 4802 Y 1
SFX 4802 0 арскаму .
SFX 1515 Y 1
SFX 1515 0 са .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 се .
SFX 3517 Y 1
SFX 3517 0 вік .
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 0 авіком .
SFX 1545 Y 1
SFX 1545 0 істах .
SFX 1840 Y 1
SFX 1840 0 істаю .
SFX 1926 Y 1
SFX 1926 0 істая .
SFX 1533 Y 1
SFX 1533 0 істаў .
SFX 1576 Y 1
SFX 1576 0 рнымі .
SFX 4808 Y 1
SFX 4808 0 анскую .
SFX 4882 Y 1
SFX 4882 0 мала .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 жны .
SFX 4970 Y 1
SFX 4970 0 ору .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 аючым .
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 0 ўшаму .
SFX 1555 Y 1
SFX 1555 0 нную .
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 ыўся .
SFX 4164 Y 1
SFX 4164 0 ернымі .
SFX 3608 Y 1
SFX 3608 0 біце .
SFX 761 Y 1
SFX 761 0 емся .
SFX 3859 Y 1
SFX 3859 0 алагічны .
SFX 3309 Y 1
SFX 3309 0 заўшымі .
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 0 ткамі .
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 0 еўшаму .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 0 ванаму .
SFX 3110 Y 1
SFX 3110 0 ліш .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 0 ліў .
SFX 3329 Y 1
SFX 3329 0 жваючаму .
SFX 4467 Y 1
SFX 4467 0 злі .
SFX 4250 Y 1
SFX 4250 0 ейце .
SFX 2437 Y 1
SFX 2437 0 енне .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 0 іруе .
SFX 2249 Y 1
SFX 2249 0 іруй .
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 0 аванаму .
SFX 4255 Y 1
SFX 4255 0 гадовымі .
SFX 3074 Y 1
SFX 3074 0 ынай .
SFX 3629 Y 1
SFX 3629 0 ынам .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 раць .
SFX 3492 Y 1
SFX 3492 0 ліцца .
SFX 704 Y 1
SFX 704 0 ленага .
SFX 4969 Y 1
SFX 4969 0 очкамі .
SFX 4246 Y 1
SFX 4246 0 йкам .
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 0 іраваўшым .
SFX 1571 Y 1
SFX 1571 0 аўнай .
SFX 3507 Y 1
SFX 3507 0 кавалі .
SFX 4432 Y 1
SFX 4432 0 ізуючую .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 тую .
SFX 3489 Y 1
SFX 3489 0 ненню .
SFX 3488 Y 1
SFX 3488 0 нення .
SFX 3490 Y 1
SFX 3490 0 ненні .
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 0 ючую .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 0 цкі .
SFX 2711 Y 1
SFX 2711 0 тавым .
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 0 рскую .
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 іну .
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 0 іны .
SFX 4470 Y 1
SFX 4470 0 завацца .
SFX 4739 Y 1
SFX 4739 0 каецеся .
SFX 4567 Y 1
SFX 4567 0 оўвае .
SFX 4563 Y 1
SFX 4563 0 оўвай .
SFX 4836 Y 1
SFX 4836 0 цыйным .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 0 ліваму .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 ваючымі .
SFX 1981 Y 1
SFX 1981 0 дах .
SFX 1955 Y 1
SFX 1955 0 даю .
SFX 1702 Y 1
SFX 1702 0 даў .
SFX 1744 Y 1
SFX 1744 0 оўкамі .
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 0 заваў .
SFX 4000 Y 1
SFX 4000 0 шацца .
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 0 ападобнымі .
SFX 1380 Y 1
SFX 1380 0 ляючага .
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 0 авіку .
SFX 3070 Y 1
SFX 3070 0 авікі .
SFX 1338 Y 1
SFX 1338 0 ляецца .
SFX 3678 Y 1
SFX 3678 0 водам .
SFX 4548 Y 1
SFX 4548 0 оўваўшых .
SFX 4547 Y 1
SFX 4547 0 оўваўшыя .
SFX 2422 Y 1
SFX 2422 0 зячых .
SFX 2421 Y 1
SFX 2421 0 зячыя .
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 0 льшчыцай .
SFX 3293 Y 1
SFX 3293 0 льшчыцам .
SFX 2979 Y 1
SFX 2979 0 ьскіх .
SFX 2978 Y 1
SFX 2978 0 ьскія .
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 ваюся .
SFX 4252 Y 1
SFX 4252 0 дзіцца .
SFX 1068 Y 1
SFX 1068 0 йся .
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 0 аемся .
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 0 уся .
SFX 1630 Y 1
SFX 1630 0 ліваеце .
SFX 4805 Y 1
SFX 4805 0 арскага .
SFX 1015 Y 1
SFX 1015 0 чках .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 0 чкаю .
SFX 2821 Y 1
SFX 2821 0 анку .
SFX 2725 Y 1
SFX 2725 0 анкі .
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 0 ьвайце .
SFX 3478 Y 1
SFX 3478 0 ьванне .
SFX 3628 Y 1
SFX 3628 0 ыстка .
SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 0 авальнаю .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 0 авальная .
SFX 3164 Y 1
SFX 3164 0 за .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 зе .
SFX 1511 Y 1
SFX 1511 0 зм .
SFX 3607 Y 1
SFX 3607 0 віку .
SFX 3856 Y 1
SFX 3856 0 вікі .
SFX 3145 Y 1
SFX 3145 0 нутымі .
SFX 4360 Y 1
SFX 4360 0 іроўцы .
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 0 льшчыка .
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 0 рны .
SFX 3155 Y 1
SFX 3155 0 кне .
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 0 гаюць .
SFX 4153 Y 1
SFX 4153 0 заваўшымі .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 0 ўшага .
SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 0 зься .
SFX 3115 Y 1
SFX 3115 0 істкай .
SFX 3043 Y 1
SFX 3043 0 істкам .
SFX 1797 Y 1
SFX 1797 0 чыўшымі .
SFX 2639 Y 1
SFX 2639 0 яўшым .
SFX 1541 Y 1
SFX 1541 0 нных .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 0 нныя .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 0 авою .
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 аючую .
SFX 4035 Y 1
SFX 4035 0 зячыся .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 чыўшым .
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 0 еўшага .
SFX 1953 Y 1
SFX 1953 0 ічны .
SFX 550 Y 1
SFX 550 0 уючым .
SFX 751 Y 1
SFX 751 0 ванага .
SFX 2878 Y 1
SFX 2878 0 пала .
SFX 3332 Y 1
SFX 3332 0 жваючага .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 шчах .
SFX 3021 Y 1
SFX 3021 0 шчаў .
SFX 3083 Y 1
SFX 3083 0 учымі .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 аванага .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 хаўшым .
SFX 2897 Y 1
SFX 2897 0 лілі .
SFX 2589 Y 1
SFX 2589 0 тнаму .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 рамі .
SFX 3776 Y 1
SFX 3776 0 ыстымі .
SFX 4984 Y 1
SFX 4984 0 іях .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 іяю .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 оўны .
SFX 1560 Y 1
SFX 1560 0 ачках .
SFX 1881 Y 1
SFX 1881 0 ачкаю .
SFX 4428 Y 1
SFX 4428 0 ізуючых .
SFX 4427 Y 1
SFX 4427 0 ізуючыя .
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 0 тых .
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 0 тыя .
SFX 2672 Y 1
SFX 2672 0 ваўшыся .
SFX 4340 Y 1
SFX 4340 0 оўшчыкам .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 ючых .
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 0 ючыя .
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 0 каватымі .
SFX 1866 Y 1
SFX 1866 0 чыла .
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 0 лівага .
SFX 1030 Y 1
SFX 1030 0 чкамі .
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 0 алагічнаму .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 іраваўшую .
SFX 4689 Y 1
SFX 4689 0 рыўшыся .
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 0 ася .
SFX 2745 Y 1
SFX 2745 0 тавую .
SFX 4562 Y 1
SFX 4562 0 оўвайце .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 авічам .
SFX 4838 Y 1
SFX 4838 0 цыйную .
SFX 4557 Y 1
SFX 4557 0 оўваўшае .
SFX 4556 Y 1
SFX 4556 0 оўваўшай .
SFX 2430 Y 1
SFX 2430 0 зячае .
SFX 2429 Y 1
SFX 2429 0 зячай .
SFX 1270 Y 1
SFX 1270 0 шчыцу .
SFX 1269 Y 1
SFX 1269 0 шчыцы .
SFX 3096 Y 1
SFX 3096 0 паўшымі .
SFX 1155 Y 1
SFX 1155 0 кавымі .
SFX 2877 Y 1
SFX 2877 0 ўкамі .
SFX 3139 Y 1
SFX 3139 0 тара .
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 0 кацца .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 0 еру .
SFX 1675 Y 1
SFX 1675 0 еры .
SFX 3689 Y 1
SFX 3689 0 ыстках .
SFX 3626 Y 1
SFX 3626 0 ысткаю .
SFX 4898 Y 1
SFX 4898 0 йкамі .
SFX 1547 Y 1
SFX 1547 0 ачку .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 0 ачкі .
SFX 4407 Y 1
SFX 4407 0 оўнаму .
SFX 4447 Y 1
SFX 4447 0 ізаваць .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 ём .
SFX 4329 Y 1
SFX 4329 0 рце .
SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 0 уемся .
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 0 льны .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 скімі .
SFX 3544 Y 1
SFX 3544 0 ўнаю .
SFX 2369 Y 1
SFX 2369 0 ўная .
SFX 4286 Y 1
SFX 4286 0 ьніку .
SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 0 анскае .
SFX 4815 Y 1
SFX 4815 0 анскай .
SFX 1083 Y 1
SFX 1083 0 ст .
SFX 1110 Y 1
SFX 1110 0 су .
SFX 1514 Y 1
SFX 1514 0 сы .
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 0 сь .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 ся .
SFX 2712 Y 1
SFX 2712 0 сі .
SFX 3033 Y 1
SFX 3033 0 нуты .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 віч .
SFX 3978 Y 1
SFX 3978 0 віў .
SFX 3351 Y 1
SFX 3351 0 авікоў .
SFX 2666 Y 1
SFX 2666 0 нецеся .
SFX 1434 Y 1
SFX 1434 0 арамі .
SFX 3839 Y 1
SFX 3839 0 куйце .
SFX 1659 Y 1
SFX 1659 0 ннае .
SFX 1627 Y 1
SFX 1627 0 ннай .
SFX 4247 Y 1
SFX 4247 0 знаўства .
SFX 4766 Y 1
SFX 4766 0 знаўстве .
SFX 4354 Y 1
SFX 4354 0 малі .
SFX 4202 Y 1
SFX 4202 0 чваннем .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 аючых .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 аючыя .
SFX 2640 Y 1
SFX 2640 0 яўшую .
SFX 3861 Y 1
SFX 3861 0 яеце .
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 0 біць .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 чыўшую .
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 0 уючую .
SFX 4392 Y 1
SFX 4392 0 шуся .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 0 ліва .
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 0 тнага .
SFX 4628 Y 1
SFX 4628 0 атара .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 іце .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 насць .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 насцю .
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 0 насці .
SFX 2771 Y 1
SFX 2771 0 хаўшую .
SFX 1811 Y 1
SFX 1811 0 мым .
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 0 енню .
SFX 2629 Y 1
SFX 2629 0 ення .
SFX 2610 Y 1
SFX 2610 0 енні .
SFX 2247 Y 1
SFX 2247 0 ірую .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 ўшы .
